Utah statutes.
32A-12-219 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful adulteration -- Licensing tampering.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "tamper" means to do one or more of the following to the contents of a package:

(a)  fortify;

(b)  adulterate;

(c)  contaminate;

(d)  dilute;

(e)  change its character or purity; or

(f)  otherwise change.

(2)  A person may not, for any purpose, mix or allow to be mixed with an alcoholic beverage sold or supplied by the person as a beverage any of the following:

(a)  a drug;

(b)  methylic alcohol;

(c)  a crude, unrectified, or impure form of ethylic alcohol; or

(d)  another deleterious substance.

(3) (a)  The following may not engage in an act listed in Subsection (3)(b):

(i)  a retail licensee;

(ii)  a permittee;

(iii)  a package agent;

(iv)  a beer wholesaler;

(v)  a supplier;

(vi)  an importer; or

(vii)  a warehouser.

(b)  A person listed in Subsection (3)(a) may not:

(i)  tamper with the contents of a package of alcoholic beverage as originally marketed by a manufacturer;

(ii)  refill or partly refill with any substance the contents of an original package of alcoholic beverage as originally marketed by a manufacturer;

(iii)  misrepresent the brand of an alcoholic beverage sold or offered for sale; or

(iv)  sell or serve a brand of alcoholic beverage that is not the same as that ordered by a purchaser without first advising the purchaser of the difference.

